Washington statutes.
RCW 35.60.040

Bonds—Laws applicable to authorization and issuance.

Any bonds to be issued by any municipality pursuant to the provisions of RCW 35.60.030, shall be authorized and issued in the manner and within the limitations prescribed by the Constitution and laws of this state or charter of the municipality for the issuance and authorization of bonds thereof for public purposes generally and secured by a general tax levy as provided by law. Such bonds shall be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 1984 c 186 s 20; 1983 c 167 s 51; 1965 c 7 s 35.60.040. Prior: 1961 c 149 s 4; prior: 1961 c 39 s 4.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1984 c 186: See note following RCW 39.46.110.

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.